Hawaii statutes.
§431:10G-202 Rate filings. (a) Every
insurer shall file with the commissioner every manual of classification, rule,
rate, rating plan, designation of rating territories, or standard for
motorcycle or motor scooter insurance which it proposes to use. Every filing
shall state the proposed effective date of the filing and the character and
extent of the coverage contemplated.

(b) The commissioner also may accept from an
advisory organization basic standards, manuals of classification, territories,
endorsements, forms, and other materials, not dealing with rates, for reference
filings by insurers.

(c) Each filing shall be accompanied by a $20
fee payable to the commissioner, which fee shall be deposited in the
commissioner's education and training fund.

(d) A filing and any supporting information
shall be open to the public upon filing with the commissioner. [L 1989, c 208,
pt of §1]

Cross References

Commissioner's education and training fund, see §431:2-214.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next